Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-1206
Address or substitute address; use; when.

(1) A program participant may request that state and local agencies use the address designated by the Secretary of State as the program participant's substitute address. When creating a new public record, a state or local agency which has a bona fide statutory, tax situs, or administrative requirement for the participant's residence address may request that the participant verbally provide the agency with such residence address if the agency has the capability to use such address for such bona fide purpose without permanently entering it into the agency's records. If the agency does not have such capability, it shall accept the address designated by the Secretary of State as a program participant's substitute address, unless the Secretary of State determines that:

(a) The state or local agency has a bona fide statutory, tax situs, or administrative requirement for the use of the address which would otherwise be confidential under the Address Confidentiality Act; and

(b) The address will be used only for such bona fide statutory, tax situs, or administrative requirement.

(2) The Secretary of State shall forward all first-class mail to each program participant's substitute address.

Laws 2003, LB 228, § 6.